North Dakota statutes. TITLE 35 Liens
CHAPTER 35-29 Uniform Federal Lien Registration Act

35-29-01.
Scope.

This chapter applies only to federal tax liens and to other federal liens notices of which under any act of Congress or any regulation adopted pursuant thereto are required or permitted to be filed in the same manner as notices of federal tax liens.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 386, § 1.

Note.

Jurisdictions which have adopted the 1926, 1962 or 1966 Uniform Federal Tax Lien Registration Act include: Alaska, Arkansas, California, Colorado, Connecticut, Delaware, Georgia, Hawaii, Idaho, Illinois, Indiana, Iowa, Kansas, Kentucky, Louisiana, Maryland, Massachusetts, Michigan, Minnesota, Missouri, Montana, Nebraska, Nevada, New Hampshire, New Mexico, New York, North Carolina, North Dakota, Oklahoma, Oregon, Pennsylvania, Rhode Island, South Carolina, South Dakota, Tennessee, Utah, Virginia, Wisconsin and Wyoming.

Collateral References.

Future advances: priority as between federal tax lien and mortgage to secure future advances or expenditures by mortgagee, 90 A.L.R.2d 1179.

Choate or inchoate, liens competing with federal priorities as, 94 A.L.R.2d 748.

Notice: sufficiency of designation of taxpayer in recorded notice of federal tax lien, 3 A.L.R.3d 633.

Comparative Legislation.

Jurisdictions which have enacted the 1978 Uniform Federal Lien Registration Act include:

Ala. Code §§ 35-11-42 to 35-11-48.

Alaska Stat. §§ 40.19.010 to 40.19.050.

Ariz. Rev. Stat. Ann. §§ 33-1031 to 33-1035.

Ark. §§ 18-47-201 to 18-47-207.

Cal. Civ. Proc. Code §§ 2100 to 2107.

Colo. Rev. Stat. §§ 38-25-101 to 38-25-107.

Conn. Gen. Stat. § 49-32a.

Del. Title 25, §§ 3101 to 3105.

Fl. § 713.901.

Idaho Code §§ 45-201 to 45-207.

Ill. 770 ILCS 110/1 to 770 ILCS 110/7.

Iowa Code § 331.609.

Kan. Stat. Ann. §§ 79-2613 to 79-2619.

La. Rev. Stat. Ann. §§ 52:51 to 52:56.

Me. Rev. Stat. Ann. tit. 33, §§ 1901 to 1907.

Md. Real Prop. Code Ann. §§ 3-401 to 3-405.

Mich. Comp. Laws §§ 211.661 to 211.668.

Minn. Stat. §§ 272.479, 272.481 to 272.488.

Miss. Code Ann. §§ 85-8-1 to 85-8-15.

Mont. Code Ann. §§ 71-3-201 to 71-3-207.

Neb. Rev. Stat. §§ 52-1001 to 52-1008.

Nev. Rev. Stat. §§ 108.825 to 108.837.

N.H. Rev. Stat. Ann. §§ 454-B:1 to 454-B:8.

N.J.S.A. 46:16-15 to 46:16-19.

N.M. Stat. Ann §§ 48-1-1 to 48-1-7.

N.Y. Lien Law §§ 240 to 245.

N.C. §§ 44-68.10 to 44-68.17.

Okla. Stat. tit. 68, §§ 24302.5 to 24302.11.

Or. Rev. Stat. §§ 87.806 to 87.831.

Pa. 74 P.S. §§ 157-1 to 157-8.

S.D. Cod. Laws Ann. §§ 44-7-1 to 44-7-8.3.

Tex. Prop. Code Ann. §§ 14.001 to 14.007.

Va. Code §§ 55-142.1 to 55-142.9.

Wash. Rev. Code §§ 60.68.005 to 60.68.902.

W.Va. Code §§ 38-10A-1 to 38-10A-5.

Wis. Stat. § 779.97.

Wyo. Stat. §§ 29-6-201 to 29-6-208.

Jurisdictions which have adopted the 1926, 1962 or 1966 Uniform Federal Tax Lien Registration Act include: Georgia, Hawaii, Indiana, Kentucky, Massachusetts, Missouri, Rhode Island, South Carolina, Tennessee and Utah.

35-29-02.
Place of filing.

Notices of liens, certificates, and other notices affecting federal tax liens or other federal liens must be filed in accordance with this chapter.

Notices of liens upon real property for obligations payable to the United States and certificates and notices affecting the liens must be filed in the central indexing system and associated to the county in which the real property subject to the liens is situated.

Notices of federal liens upon personal property, whether tangible or intangible, for obligations payable to the United States and certificates and notices affecting the liens must be filed as follows:

If the person against whose interest the lien applies is a corporation, limited liability company, or a partnership whose principal executive office is in this state, as these entities are defined in the internal revenue laws of the United States, in the office of the secretary of state.

If the person against whose interest the lien applies is a trust that is not covered by subdivision a, in the office of the secretary of state.

If the person against whose interest the lien applies is the estate of a decedent, in the office of the secretary of state.

In all other cases, in the office of the recorder of the county where the person against whose interest the lien applies resides at the time of filing of the notice of lien.

The secretary of state shall provide a means for the United States to file any documentation according to this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 386, § 1; 1989, ch. 423, § 1; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 2001, ch. 120, § 1; 2013, ch. 257, § 9; 2015, ch. 372, § 1.

Effective Date.

The 2013 amendment of this section by
section 9 of chapter 257, S.L. 2013 becomes effective August 1, 2016, or earlier (See contingency note below).

Note.

Ch. 372 amends chapter 257 of 2013 to provide a new effective date, August 1, 2016.

Section 50 of chapter 257, S.L. 2013 provides:

“CONTINGENT EFFECTIVE DATE.

Sections 1 through 27 and sections 29 through 47 of this Act become effective August 1, 2015, or earlier if the secretary of state makes a report to the legislative management and to the information technology committee certifying that the information technology components of the electronic filing system are ready for implementation of those provisions of this Act, in which case those sections become effective ninety days following the completion of the certificate requirement.”

35-29-03.
Execution of notices and certificates.

Certification of notices of liens, certificates, or other notices affecting federal liens by the secretary of the treasury of the United States or the secretary’s delegate, or by any official or entity of the United States responsible for filing or certifying of notice of any other lien, entitles them to be filed and no other attestation, certification, or acknowledgment is necessary.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 386, § 1.

35-29-04.
Duties of filing officer.

If a notice of federal lien, a refiling of a notice of federal lien, or a notice of revocation of any certificate described in subsection 2 is presented:

The secretary of state shall cause the notice to be marked, held, and indexed in accordance with the provisions of section 41-09-90 as if the notice were a financing statement within the meaning of title 41; or

The secretary of state shall endorse thereon the officer’s identification and the date and time of receipt and immediately file it alphabetically or enter it in an alphabetical index showing the name and address of the person named in the notice, the date and time of receipt, the title and address of the official or entity certifying the lien, and the total amount appearing on the notice of lien.

If a certificate of release, nonattachment, discharge, or subordination of any lien is presented to the secretary of state for filing, the secretary shall do all of the following:

Cause a certificate of release or nonattachment to be marked, held, and indexed as if the certificate were a termination statement within the meaning of title 41, but the notice of lien to which the certificate relates may not be removed from the files.

Cause a certificate of discharge or subordination to be marked, held, and indexed as if the certificate were a release of collateral within the meaning of title 41.

If a refiled notice of federal lien referred to in subsection 1 or any certificate or notice referred to in subsection 2 is presented for filing, the secretary of state shall permanently attach the refiled notice or the certificate to the original notice of lien and enter the refiled notice or the certificate with the date of filing in any alphabetical lien index on the line where original notice of lien is entered.

Any person may search the central indexing system to determine whether there is on file, on the date and hour stated therein, any notice of lien or certificate or notice affecting any lien filed under this chapter or chapter 35-28 as it existed prior to enactment of this chapter, naming a particular person, and if a notice or certificate is on file, giving the date and hour of filing of each notice or certificate.

The secretary of state shall fulfill any of the functions described in this section by electronic means with the same legal effect as if the function had been completed on a physical document.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 386, § 1; 2001, ch. 361, § 4; 2013, ch. 257, § 10; 2015, ch. 372, § 1.

Effective Date.

The 2013 amendment of this section by
section 10 of chapter 257, S.L. 2013 becomes effective August 1, 2016, or earlier (See contingency note below).

Note.

Ch. 372 amends chapter 257 of 2013 to provide a new effective date, August 1, 2016.

Section 50 of chapter 257, S.L. 2013 provides:

“CONTINGENT EFFECTIVE DATE.

Sections 1 through 27 and sections 29 through 47 of this Act become effective August 1, 2015, or earlier if the secretary of state makes a report to the legislative management and to the information technology committee certifying that the information technology components of the electronic filing system are ready for implementation of those provisions of this Act, in which case those sections become effective ninety days following the completion of the certificate requirement.”

35-29-05.
Fees.

The fee for filing and indexing each notice of lien in the central indexing system is established according to section 41-09-96. Fees to record liens with a county recorder are the same as provided for under section 11-18-05.

The officer may not file or record an instrument under this chapter unless the person offering the instrument for filing or recording has first paid the requisite filing or recording fee.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 386, § 1; 1989, ch. 424, § 1; 1999, ch. 314, § 2; 2011, ch. 250, § 2; 2013, ch. 257, § 11; 2015, ch. 372, § 1.

Effective Date.

The 2013 amendment of this section by
section 11 of chapter 257, S.L. 2013 becomes effective August 1, 2016, or earlier (See contingency note below).

Note.

Ch. 372 amends chapter 257 of 2013 to provide a new effective date, August 1, 2016.

Section 50 of chapter 257, S.L. 2013 provides:

“CONTINGENT EFFECTIVE DATE.

Sections 1 through 27 and sections 29 through 47 of this Act become effective August 1, 2015, or earlier if the secretary of state makes a report to the legislative management and to the information technology committee certifying that the information technology components of the electronic filing system are ready for implementation of those provisions of this Act, in which case those sections become effective ninety days following the completion of the certificate requirement.”

35-29-06.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Uniform Federal Lien Registration Act.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 386, § 1.